Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
In General
[Repealed]

§§ 25-9-1 through 25-9-49.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1980, ch. 303, § 17, eff from and after February 1, 1981.

§25-9-1 through25-9-11. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8935-01 to 8935-03; Laws, 1970, ch. 394, §§ 1-3]

§25-9-13. [Codes, 1942, § 8935-03; Laws, 1970, ch. 394, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 7]

§25-9-15 through §25-9-39. [Codes, 1942, §§ 8935-03 to 8935-12; Laws, 1970, ch. 394, §§ 3-12]

§25-9-41 through §25-9-47. [En Laws, 1976, ch. 377, §§ 1-4]

§25-9-49. [En Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 7]